nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Landbouwmachines > Grondbewerking: Beitelploegen; Schijveneggen; Wentelploegen; Roterende frezen; Spikeeggen; Subsoilers; Verticale grondbewerking
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Jordbruksmaskiner > Jordbearbetning: Mejselplogar; Tallriksharvar; Ploghyvel; Roterande jordfräsar; Spikharvar; Jordbearbetningsmaskiner; Vertikal jordbearbetning
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Maquinaria agrícola > Labranza: Arados de cincel; Gradas de discos; Arados de vertedera; Cultivadores rotativos; Gradas de púas; Subsoladores; Labranza vertical
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Máquinas agrícolas > Preparo do solo: Arados escarificadores; Grades de disco; Arados de aiveca; Enxadas rotativas; Grade de dentes fixos; Subsoladores; Cultivo vertical
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Landbrugsmaskiner > Jordbearbejdning: Mejselplove; Tallerkenharver; Muldpladeplove; Roterende jordfresere; Tandharver; Dybdeharver; Vertikal jordbearbejdning
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 農業機械 > 耕作: 鑿犁; 圓盤耙; 鈧式犁; 旋耕機; 史派克·哈羅斯; 深鬆機; 垂直耕作
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 農業機械 > 耕運機: チゼルプラウ; ディスクハロー; モールドボードプラウ; ロータリー耕運機; スパイクハロー; サブソイラー; バーティカルティレッジ
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Maatalouskoneet > Maanmuokkaus: Jankkurit; Lautasäkeet; Kyntöaurat; Kiertokultivaattorit; Piikkikultivaattorit; Syväkyntöaurat; Pystymuokkaus
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 농업 기계 > 경작: 끌 쟁기; 디스크 해로우; 몰드보드 쟁기; 로터리 틸러; 스파이크 해로우; 서브소일러; 수직 경운
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Máquinas agrícolas > Lavoura: Arados de cinzel; Grades de discos; Arados de aiveca; Cultivadores rotativos; Grades de dentes; Subsoladores; Lavoura vertical
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Poljoprivredni strojevi > Obrada tla: Dlijetasti plugovi; Disk drljače; Plugovi za rezanje; Rotacijske freze; Klinasti plug; Podrivači; Vertikalna obrada tla
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Mezőgazdasági gépek > Talajművelés: Vésőekék; Tárcsás boronák; Kormánylapos ekék; Rotációs talajmarók; Fogas boronák; Mélylazítók; Függőleges talajművelés
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 农业机械 > 耕作机械: 凿式犁; 圆盘耙; 板式犁; 旋耕机; 钉齿耙; 深松机; 垂直耕作工具
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Poľnohospodárske stroje > Obroba pôdy: Dlátové pluhy; Diskové brány; Orebné pluhy; Rotačné kultivátory; Hrotové brány; Hĺbkové kypriče; Vertikálna obroba pôdy
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zemědělské stroje > Obdělávání půdy: Dlátové pluhy; Talířové brány; Radličné pluhy; Rotační kypřiče; Hřebové brány; Podrýváky; Vertikální zpracování půdy
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Macchinari agricoli > Lavorazione del terreno: Aratri a scalpello; Erpici a dischi; Aratri a versoio; Frese agricole; Erpici a punte; Ripuntatori; Vertical Tillage (Lavorazione del terreno in verticale)
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Landbruksmaskiner > Jordbearbeiding: Meiselploger; Skiveharver; Ploger med veltefjøl; Roterende jordfresere; Piggharver; Jordløsnere; Vertikal jordbearbeiding
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Utilaje agricole > Arat: Cultivatoare; Grape cu discuri; Pluguri cu cormană; Freze; Grape cu spițe; Adâncitoare de brazdă; Arat vertical
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Сельскохозяйственная техника > Обработка почвы: Чизельные плуги; Дисковые бороны; Отвальные плуги; Роторные культиваторы; Зубчатые  бороны; Почвоуглубители; Вертикальная обработка почвы
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Agriculture Machinery > Tillage: Chisel Plows; Disc Harrows; Moldboard Plows; Rotary Tillers; Spike Harrows; Subsoilers; Vertical Tillage
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Kmetijski stroji > Obdelava tal: Dletasti plugi; Krožne brane; Ovratni plugi; Rotacijske freze; Zobate brane; Podrahljalniki; Vertikalna obdelava tal
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > เครื่องจักรกลการเกษตร > การไถพรวน: ไคันถสิ่ว; คราดแบบจาน; คันไถแบบแผ่นไม้; เครื่องไถดินแบบโรตารี่; คราดหนาม; เครื่องไถใต้ผิวดิน; การไถพรวนแนวตั้ง
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Machines agricoles > Labour: Charrues à chisel; Herses à disques; Charrues à versoir; Motoculteurs; Herses à pointes; Sous-soleuses; Labour vertical
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Γεωργικά μηχανήματα > Καλλιέργεια εδάφους: Καλλιεργητές σμίλης; Δισκοσβάρνες; Αναστρεφόμενα άροτρα; Περιστροφικές φρέζες; Ακιδωτές σβάρνες; Υποσκαπτικά άροτρα; Κάθετη κατεργασία εδάφους
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Селскостопанска техника > Обработка на почвата: Длетови плугове; Дискови брани; Плугове за откоси; Роторни фрези; Зъбни брани; Подпочвени култиватори; Вертикална обработка на почвата
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Máy móc nông nghiệp > Làm đất: Máy cày lưỡi đục; Máy bừa đĩa; Máy cày lật đất; Máy xới đất; Bừa răng nhọn; Máy xới đất sâu; Làm đất thẳng đứng
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Žemės ūkio technika > Žemės dirbimas: Kaltiniai plūgai; Lėkštinės akėčios; Vartomi plūgai; Rotaciniai kultivatoriai; Akėčiai; Podirvio gilinimo įrenginiai; Vertikalus žemės dirbimas
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Maszyny rolnicze > Uprawa roli: Pługi dłutowe; Brony talerzowe; Pługi lemieszowe; Glebogryzarki rotacyjne; Brony kolczaste; Głębosze; Uprawa pionowa
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Landwirtschaftliche Maschinen > Bodenbearbeitung: Meißelpflüge; Scheibeneggen; Scharpflüge; Kreiselfräsen; Zinkeneggen; Tiefenlockerer; Vertikale Bodenbearbeitung
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Tarım Makinaları > Toprak İşleme: Keski Pulluklar; Diskli Tırmıklar; Kalıplı Sabanlar; Döner Tırmıklar; Spike Tırmıkları; Alt toprak kazıcılar; Dikey Toprak İşleme